da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Cardio > Tilbehør og dele til cardiomaskiner > Tilbehør og dele til motionscykler: Flaskeholdere til motionscykler; Computere til motionscykler; Covers til motionscykler; Puder til motionscykler; Drivremme til motionscykler; Pulsmålere til motionscykler; Pedaler til motionscykler; Sadler til motionscykler; Stativer til motionscykler; Tabletholdere til motionscykler
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 心肺運動 > 心肺訓練器材配件/零件 > 健身車配件: 健身車瓶架; 健身車電腦; 健身車護罩; 健身車護墊; 健身車傳動皮帶; 健身車心率監測器; 健身車踏板; 健身車坐墊; 健身車支架; 健身車平板電腦架
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Konditionsträning > Tillbehör och delar till konditionsträningsmaskiner > Tillbehör och delar till motionscykel: Flaskhållare för motionscykel; Motionscykeldatorer; Motionscykelskydd; Motionscykelkuddar; Drivremmar för träningscyklar; Motionscykelpulsmätare; Pedaler för träningscyklar; Sadlar för träningscyklar; Motionscykelställ; Surfplattehållare för träningscyklar
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Cardio > Accessoires en onderdelen voor cardioapparaten > Accessoires en onderdelen voor hometrainers: Flessenhouders voor hometrainers; Computers voor hometrainers; Hoezen voor hometrainers; Kussens voor hometrainers; Hometraineraandrijfriemen; Hartslagmeters voor hometrainers; Hometrainerpedalen; Hometrainerzadels; Standaards voor hometrainers; Hometrainertablethouders
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Кардиотренировки > Аксессуары и детали для кардиотренажеров > Аксессуары и детали для велотренажеров: Держатели бутылок для велотренажеров; Компьютеры для велотренажеров; Чехлы для велотренажеров; Мягкие накладки на седла велотренажеров; Приводные ремни для велотренажеров; Пульсометры для велотренажеров; Педали для велотренажеров; Сиденья для велотренажеров; Стойки для велотренажеров; Держатели для планшетов для велотренажеров
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Cardio > Accessori e ricambi per macchine cardio > Accessori e parti per cyclette: Portabottiglie per cyclette; Computer per cyclette; Coperture per cyclette; Cuscini per cyclette; Cinghie di trasmissione per cyclette; Cardiofrequenzimetri per cyclette; Pedali per cyclette; Sellini per cyclette; Supporti per cyclette; Supporti per tablet per cyclette
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Kardió > Kardiógép-kiegészítők és -alkatrészek > Szobakerékpár-kiegészítők és -alkatrészek: Szobakerékpár-palacktartók; Szobakerékpár-számítógépek; Szobakerékpár-huzatok; Szobakerékpár-párnák; Szobakerékpár-hajtószíjak; Szobakerékpár-pulzusmérők; Szobakerékpár-pedálok; Szobakerékpár-ülések; Szobakerékpár-állványok; Szobakerékpár-táblagéptartók
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 카디오 > 카디오 머신 부대용품/부품 > 실내 자전거 부대용품/부품: 실내 자전거 음료수병 홀더; 실내 자전거 컴퓨터; 실내 자전거 커버; 실내 자전거 쿠션; 실내 자전거 구동 벨트; 실내 자전거 심박수 모니터; 실내 자전거 페달; 실내 자전거 안장; 실내 자전거 스탠드; 실내 자전거 태블릿 홀더
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 有氧运动 > 有氧运动器械配件/零件 > 健身车配件/零件: 健身车水瓶支架; 健身车用计算机; 健身车罩; 健身车坐垫; 健身车传动带; 健身车心率监测器; 健身车踏板; 健身车座椅; 健身车支架; 健身车平板电脑支架
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Cardio > Accesorii și piese pentru aparate de fitness > Accesorii și piese pentru biciclete statice: Suporturi pentru sticle pentru biciclete statice; Computere pentru biciclete statice; Huse pentru biciclete statice; Perne pentru șa pentru biciclete statice; Curele de transmisie pentru biciclete de fitness; Monitoare de ritm cardiac pentru biciclete statice; Pedale pentru biciclete de exerciții; Șei pentru biciclete de exerciții; Standuri pentru biciclete statice; Suporturi pentru tabletă la biciclete de exerciții
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Ασκήσεις καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Αξεσουάρ & ανταλλακτικά για μηχανήματα καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Αξεσουάρ και εξαρτήματα ποδηλάτου γυμναστικής: Θήκες μπουκαλιών ποδηλάτου γυμναστικής; Υπολογιστές ποδηλάτων γυμναστικής; Καλύμματα ποδηλάτου γυμναστικής; Μαξιλάρια ποδηλάτου γυμναστικής; Ιμάντες κίνησης ποδηλάτων γυμναστικής; Συσκευές παρακολούθησης καρδιακών παλμών ποδηλάτου γυμναστικής; Πετάλια ποδηλάτων γυμναστικής; Σέλες ποδηλάτων γυμναστικής; Βάσεις ποδηλάτων γυμναστικής; Βάσεις tablet ποδηλάτων γυμναστικής
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > 有酸素運動 > カーディオマシン関連用品・部品 > エアロバイク関連用品・部品: エアロバイクボトルホルダー; エアロバイクコンピューター; エアロバイクカバー; エアロバイククッション; エクササイズバイク用ドライブベルト; エアロバイク心拍数モニター; エクササイズバイク用ペダル; エクササイズバイク用シート; エアロバイクスタンド; エクササイズバイク用タブレットホルダー
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Trening kardio > Akcesoria i części do urządzeń cardio > Akcesoria i części do rowerów treningowych: Uchwyty na bidon do rowerów treningowych; Komputery do rowerów treningowych; Pokrowce na rowery treningowe; Poduszki do rowerów treningowych; Paski napędowe do rowerów treningowych; Czujniki tętna do rowerów treningowych; Pedały do rowerów treningowych; Siodełka do rowerów treningowych; Stojaki do rowerów treningowych; Uchwyty na tablet do rowerów treningowych
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Kardiotreniruotės > Kardiotreniruoklių priedai ir dalys > Dviračių treniruoklių priedai ir dalys: Dviračių treniruoklių butelių laikikliai; Dviračių treniruoklių kompiuteriai; Dviračių treniruoklių uždangalai; Dviračių treniruoklių pagalvėlės; Treniruoklių dviračių pavaros diržai; Širdies ritmo monitoriai dviračių treniruokliams; Treniruoklių dviračių pedalai; Treniruoklių dviračių sėdynės; Dviračių treniruoklių stovai; Treniruoklių dviračių planšečių laikikliai
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Kardio > Trenažery – příslušenství a díly > Rotopedy – díly a příslušenství: Rotopedy – držáky na lahve; Rotopedy – počítače; Rotopedy – kryty; Rotopedy – podušky na sedlo; Hnací řemeny k rotopedům; Rotopedy – monitory srdečního tepu; Pedály k rotopedům; Sedla k rotopedům; Rotopedy – stojany; Držáky na tablet k rotopedům
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardiofitness > Acessórios e peças para máquina de cardiofitness > Acessórios e peças para bicicleta de exercício: Suportes de garrafas para bicicleta de exercício; Computadores para bicicleta de exercício; Capas para bicicleta de exercício; Almofadas para bicicleta de exercício; Correias de transmissão para bicicletas estáticas; Monitores de frequência cardíaca para bicicleta de exercício; Pedais para bicicletas estáticas; Assentos para bicicletas estáticas; Suportes para bicicleta de exercício; Suportes de tablets para bicicletas estáticas
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > คาร์ดิโอ > อุปกรณ์เสริมและอะไหล่เครื่องคาร์ดิโอ > อุปกรณ์เสริมและอะไหล่จักรยานออกกำลังกาย: ที่วางขวดในจักรยานออกกำลังกาย; คอมพิวเตอร์จักรยานออกกำลังกาย; ผ้าคลุมจักรยานออกกำลังกาย; เบาะจักรยานออกกำลังกาย; สายพานจักรยานออกกำลังกาย; เครื่องวัดอัตราการเต้นหัวใจของจักรยานออกกำลังกาย; บันไดจักรยานออกกำลังกาย; เบาะจักรยานออกกำลังกาย; ขาตั้งจักรยานออกกำลังกาย; ที่วางแท็บเล็ตจักรยานออกกำลังกาย
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Cardio > Cardio Machine Accessories & Parts > Exercise Bike Accessories & Parts: Exercise Bike Bottle Holders; Exercise Bike Computers; Exercise Bike Covers; Exercise Bike Cushions; Exercise Bike Drive Belts; Exercise Bike Heart Rate Monitors; Exercise Bike Pedals; Exercise Bike Seats; Exercise Bike Stands; Exercise Bike Tablet Holders
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Kardio > Dodatki in deli za kardio naprave > Dodatki in deli za sobna kolesa: Držala za steklenice za sobna kolesa; Računalniki za sobna kolesa; Prevleke za sobna kolesa; Sedeži za sobna kolesa; Pogonski jermeni za sobna kolesa; Merilniki srčnega utripa za sobna kolesa; Pedali za sobna kolesa; Sedeži za sobna kolesa; Stojala za sobna kolesa; Držala za tablične računalnike za sobna kolesa
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Kardio cvičenie > Príslušenstvo a diely kardio prístrojov > Príslušenstvo a diely pre rotopedy: Držiaky na fľaše pre rotopedy; Počítače pre rotopedy; Obaly na rotopedy; Poťahy na sedlo rotopeda; Pohonné remene na rotoped; Monitory srdcového tepu na rotopede; Pedály na rotopedy; Sedadlá na rotopedy; Stojany na rotopedy; Držiaky na tablety pre rotopedy
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Bài tập dành cho tim > Phụ kiện và bộ phận máy tập tim mạch > Phụ kiện và bộ phận xe đạp tập thể dục: Giá đỡ bình nước cho xe đạp tập thể dục; Máy tính gắn xe đạp tập thể dục; Tấm phủ xe đạp tập thể dục; Đệm ngồi xe đạp tập thể dục; Dây curoa xe đạp tập thể dục; Máy đo nhịp tim trên xe đạp tập thể dục; Bàn đạp xe đạp tập thể dục; Yên xe đạp tập thể dục; Chân đế xe đạp tập thể dục; Giá đỡ máy tính bảng xe đạp tập thể dục
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Kestävyysurheilu > Kestävyysurheilulaitteiden lisätarvikkeet ja -osat > Kuntopyörän lisätarvikkeet ja -osat: Kuntopyörän pullotelineet; Kuntopyörän tietokoneet; Kuntopyörän suojat; Kuntopyörän tyynyt; Kuntopyörien vetohihnat; Kuntopyörän sykemittarit; Kuntopyörien polkimet; Kuntopyörien satulat; Kuntopyörätelineet; Kuntopyörien tablettitelineet
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Cardio > Accessoires et pièces pour machines cardio > Accessoires et pièces pour vélos d’exercice: Porte-bouteilles pour vélo d’exercice; Ordinateurs de vélo d’exercice; Housses de vélo d’exercice; Coussins de vélo d’exercice; Courroies de transmission pour vélos d’appartement; Moniteurs de fréquence cardiaque pour vélo d’exercice; Pédales pour vélos d’appartement; Selles pour vélos d’appartement; Supports pour vélos d’exercice; Supports de tablette pour vélos d’appartement
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Кардио тренировки > Аксесоари и части за машини за кардио > Аксесоари и части за велоергометър: Държачи за бутилки за велоергометър; Компютри за велоергометър; Покривала за велоергометър; Възглавнички за велоергометър; Задвижващи ремъци за велоергометър; Пулсомери за велоергометър; Педали за тренировъчни велосипеди; Седалки за тренировъчни велосипеди; Стойки за велоергометър; Стойки за таблети за тренировъчни велосипеди
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Cardio > Zubehör und Teile für Cardiogeräte > Zubehör und Teile für Heimtrainer: Flaschenhalter für Heimtrainer; Heimtrainer-Computer; Abdeckungen für Heimtrainer; Polster für Heimtrainer; Heimtrainer-Antriebsriemen; Herzfrequenzanzeigen für Heimtrainer; Heimtrainer-Pedale; Heimtrainer-Sättel; Heimtrainerständer; Heimtrainer-Tablet-Halterungen
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Kardio > Tilbehør og deler til kardiomaskiner > Tilbehør og deler til ergometersykler: Flaskeholdere til ergometersykler; Computere til ergometersykler; Trekk til ergometersykler; Puter til ergometersykler; Drivreimer for trimsykler; Hjertefrekvensmålere til ergometersykler; Pedaler for trimsykler; Seter for trimsykler; Stativ til ergometersykler; Nettbrettholdere for trimsykler
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Kardiyo > Kardiyo Makinesi Aksesuarları ve Parçaları > Egzersiz Bisikleti Aksesuarları ve Parçaları: Egzersiz Bisikleti Şişe Tutucular; Egzersiz Bisikleti Bilgisayarları; Egzersiz Bisikleti Kılıfları; Egzersiz Bisikleti Minderleri; Kondisyon bisikleti tahrik kayışları; Egzersiz Bisikleti Kalp Atış Hızı Monitörleri; Kondisyon bisikleti pedalları; Kondisyon bisikleti seleleri; Egzersiz Bisikleti Standları; Kondisyon bisikleti tablet tutucuları
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Kardio > Pribor i dijelovi za kardio sprave > Dodaci i dijelovi za sobne bicikle: Držači boca za sobni bicikl; Računala za sobne bicikle; Navlake za sobne bicikle; Navlaka za sjedalo za sobni bicikl; Pogonski remeni za sobni bicikl; Monitori za otkucaje srca na sobnom biciklu; Pedale za sobni bicikl; Sjedala za sobni bicikl; Stalci za sobne bicikle; Držači tableta za sobni bicikl
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Cardio > Accesorios y piezas para máquinas cardiovasculares > Accesorios y piezas para bicicletas estáticas: Portabotellas para bicicleta estática; Ordenadores para bicicletas estáticas; Fundas para bicicletas estáticas; Cojines para bicicletas estáticas; Correas de transmisión para bicicletas estáticas; Monitores de frecuencia cardíaca para bicicletas estáticas; Pedales para bicicletas estáticas; Asientos para bicicletas estáticas; Soportes para bicicletas estáticas; Soportes de tablet para bicicletas estáticas
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardio > Acessórios e peças para máquinas de cardio > Acessórios e peças para bicicletas ergométricas: Porta-garrafas para bicicletas ergométricas; Computadores para bicicletas ergométricas; Capas para bicicletas ergométricas; Almofadas para bicicletas ergométricas; Correias de transmissão para bicicletas ergométricas; Monitores de frequência cardíaca para bicicletas ergométricas; Pedais para bicicletas ergométricas; Assentos para bicicletas ergométricas; Suportes para bicicletas ergométricas; Suportes de tablet para bicicletas ergométricas